Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB676.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The staff of the Legislative Research Commission is directed to conduct a study on the
development of a Kentucky statewide health data utility. The study shall analyze and provide:
(1) Policy options for establishing a Kentucky statewide health data utility that:
(a) Is the sole statewide network for the sharing and exchange of health information;
(b) Aggregates health information received from participants; and
(c) Provides access, in a form and manner that ensures the privacy and security of personal health
information as required under federal and state law, to health information in the statewide health data utility to
authorized recipients for the purposes of:
1. Collecting and analyzing data to inform the authorized recipients as to health care access, utilization,
cost, safety, and quality in Kentucky;
2. Enabling health care professionals and health facilities to evaluate and monitor care and treatment of
patients; and
3. Enabling patients to access, through a technology enabled interface, the patient's electronic longitudinal
health record;
(2) Strategies for the direction and governance of the statewide health data utility by and through the
Legislative Research Commission; and
(3) Strategies for development of the statewide health data utility in a timely, efficient, secure, sustainable,
and cost-effective manner.
Section 2. In carrying out the duties in Section 1 of this Act, the Legislative Research Commission may:
(1) Consult with officials and other entities in this state and other states to study how they are engaging in
the development, implementation, and operation of health data utilities and collection efforts;
(2) Retain a consultant or other vendor; and
(3) Convene a working group to inform and make recommendations to Commission staff.
Section 3. A written report of staff findings, policy options, and strategies shall be submitted to the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services by December 1,
2026.
Section 4. Provisions of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, the Legislative Research Commission
shall have the authority to alternatively assign the issues identified herein to an interim joint committee or
subcommittee thereof, and to designate a study completion date.
Section 5. Sections 1 to 4 of this Act shall have the same legal status as a House Concurrent Resolution.
Became law without Governor's signature April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version